Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-175
Task force; members; compensation; expenses.

The compensation of the members of the task force shall be established by the Governor on a per diem basis, and they shall work the days and hours required to accomplish the task. Members of the task force shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1977, LB 309, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 168;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 101.